Utah statutes.
13-14-103.   Utah Motor Vehicle Franchise Advisory Board -- Creation --
Appointment of members -- Alternate members -- Chair -- Quorum -- Conflict of
interest.
(1)  There is created within the department the Utah Motor Vehicle Franchise
Advisory Board that consists of:
(a)  the executive director or the executive director's designee;
(b) seven members appointed by the executive director, with the concurrence of
the governor as follows:
(i)  one recreational motor vehicle franchisee;
(ii) three new motor vehicle franchisees from different congressional
districts in the state; and
(iii) (A)  three members representing motor vehicle franchisors registered by
the department pursuant to Section 13-14-105;
(B)  three members of the general public, none of whom shall be related to any
franchisee; or
(C)  three members consisting of any combination of these representatives
under this Subsection (1)(b)(iii).
(2) (a)  The executive director shall appoint, with the concurrence of the
governor, three alternate members, with one alternate from each of the
designations set forth in Subsections (1)(b)(i), (1)(b)(ii), and (1)(b)(iii),
except that the new motor vehicle franchisee alternate or alternates for the
designation under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) may be from any congressional
district.
(b)  An alternate shall take the place of a regular advisory board member from
the same designation at a meeting of the advisory board where that regular
advisory board member is absent or otherwise disqualified from participating
in the advisory board meeting.
(3) (a) (i)  Members of the advisory board appointed under Subsections (1)(b)
and (2) are appointed for a term of four years.
(ii)  No specific term applies to the executive director or the executive
director's designee.
(b)  The executive director may adjust the term of members who were appointed
to the advisory board prior to July 1, 2001, by extending the unexpired term
of a member for up to two additional years in order to insure that
approximately half of the members are appointed every two years.
(c)  In the event of a vacancy on the advisory board of a member appointed
under Subsection (1)(b) or (2), the executive director with the concurrence of
the governor, shall appoint an individual to complete the unexpired term of
the member whose office is vacant.
(d)  A member may not be appointed to more than two consecutive terms.
(4) (a)  The executive director or the executive director's designee is the
chair of the advisory board.
(b)  The department shall keep a record of all hearings, proceedings,
transactions, communications, and recommendations of the advisory board.
(5) (a)  Four or more members of the advisory board constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(b)  The action of a majority of a quorum present is considered the action of
the advisory board.
(6) (a)  A member of the advisory board may not participate as a board member
in a proceeding or hearing:
(i)  involving the member’s licensed business or employer; or
(ii)  when a member, a member’s business or family, or employer has a
pecuniary interest in the outcome or other conflict of interest concerning an
issue before the advisory board.
(b)  If a member of the advisory board is disqualified under Subsection
(6)(a), the executive director shall select the appropriate alternate member
to act on the issue before the advisory board as provided in Subsection (2).
(7)  Except for the executive director or the executive director's designee,
an individual may not be appointed or serve on the advisory board while
holding any other elective or appointive state or federal office.
(8) (a) (i)  A member of the advisory board who is not a government employee
shall receive no compensation or benefits for the member's services, but may
receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's
official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
services.
(b) (i)  A state government officer and employee member who does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the member's agency for the member's
service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A state government officer and employee member may decline to receive
per diem and expenses for the member's service.
(9)  The department shall provide necessary staff support to the advisory
board.
